Tables/Contraction/en-us-g2.ctb
###############################################################################
# BRLTTY - A background process providing access to the console screen (when in
#          text mode) for a blind person using a refreshable braille display.
#
# Copyright (C) 1995-2026 by The BRLTTY Developers.
#
# BRLTTY comes with ABSOLUTELY NO WARRANTY.
#
# This is free software, placed under the terms of the
# GNU Lesser General Public License, as published by the Free Software
# Foundation; either version 2.1 of the License, or (at your option) any
# later version. Please see the file LICENSE-LGPL for details.
#
# Web Page: http://brltty.app/
#
# This software is maintained by Dave Mielke <dave@mielke.cc>.
###############################################################################

# BRLTTY Contraction Table - English (EBAE, grade 2)
# Created by John Boyer <director@chpi.org>.

class vowel aeiouyAEIOUY
class consonant bcdfghjklmnpqrstvwxzBCDFGHJKLMNPQRSTVWXZ
class o oO
class apostrophe '

numsign 3456  number sign, just one operand
letsign 56
capsign 6
begcaps 6-6
endcaps 6-3
# If you don't want capitalization comment out the preceding three lines.

# the decimal digits
always 1 1
always 2 12
always 3 14
always 4 145
always 5 15
always 6 124
always 7 1245
always 8 125
always 9 24
always 0 245

# the letter a
lastlargesign a 1
always a 1
always A 1
begword a- 1-36 a-goin'
begword a-com 1-36-14-135-134 a-comin' a-coming
always about 1-12
contraction ab
always above 1-12-1236
contraction abv
always according 1-14
contraction ac
always across 1-14-1235
contraction acr
always ae =
endword aed 1-1246
word aforesaid 1-123456-15-234-145
before vowel begword after 1-124-2345-12456 afterimage
sufword after 1-124 afterbirth
contraction af
sufword afternoon 1-124-1345 afternoons
contraction afn
always afterward 1-124-2456
contraction afw
word again 1-1245
contraction ag
sufword ag'in 1-1245-3-35 ag'inst
word against 1-1245-34
contraction agst
endword ageries = messageries
endword agery = savagery
sufword airedale =
midendword ally 6-13456
word almost 1-123-134
contraction alm
word already 1-123-1235
contraction alr
word also 1-123
contraction al
word although 1-123-1456
word alth =
word altogether 1-123-2345
contraction alt
word always 1-123-2456
contraction alw
midendword ance 46-15
largesign and 12346
sufword anemone =
midword angh = Shanghai
begword antenn 1-1345-2345-26-1345 antenna
begword anterio 1-1345-2345-12456-24-135 anterior
word antigone =
word antin 1-1345-2345-35 NY state senator Benjamin Antin
word antins 1-1345-2345-35-234 the Antins
sufword anting 1-1345-2345-346
begword aqued = aqueduct
always ar 345
word aright 1-5-1235
always arubber 1-1235-136-23-12456 indiarubber
word as 1356
contraction as
sufword aspidistra 1-234-1234-24-145-24-34-1235-1
sufword asshur 1-234-146-136-1235
midendword ation 6-1345
sufword audio = audiofile
midendword aunder 1-136-1345-145-12456 saunders
begword auto = autofocus

# the letter b
always b 12
always B 12
sufword bachelordom 12-1-16-15-123-135-1235-145-135-134
always balone = abalone baloney
begword barthole 12-345-1456-135-123-15 Bartholemy
sufword bathorse =
sufword battle = battleaxe
word battled 12-1-2345-2345-123-1246
sufword battler 12-1-2345-2345-123-12456 battlers
midword bb 23
midendword bble 12-3456
lowword be 23
begword be 23
sufword be\s-\s 12-15-36-36
word bea = Beatrice's nickname
begword bea 12-2
always bear 12-15-345
begword beatif 23-1-2345-24-124
begword beatit 23-1-2345-24-2345
begword beatr 23-1-2345-1235 Beatrice
begword becc 12-15-25 beccaccia
always beck 12-15-14-13
always bed 12-1246
begword beda 23-145-1 bedazzle
begword bede 23-145-15 bedevil
word bede 12-1246-15 bede (a name)
begword bedi 23-145-24 bedizzened
begword bedra 23-145-1235-1 bedraggled
word bee 12-15-15
begword bee 12-15-15
always been 12-15-26
always beer 12-15-12456
begword beff 12-15-235 beffana
word beg =
begword begg 12-15-2356
word begs =
begword beid = Beidermeier
begword beig = beige
word bein 23-24-1345
word bein' 23-24-1345-3
sufword beijing 12-15-24-245-346
word beirut =
sufword belch 12-15-123-16
begword beld = Beldon
begword belf = belfry, belfast
begword belfor 12-15-123-123456 Belford
begword belg = Belgium
sufword belittle 23-123-123
begword belk = Belkin
always bell =
begword belm = Belmont
sufword belsen 12-15-123-234-26 Bergen-Belsen
always belsh 12-15-123-146
always belt =
begword belv = belvedere
begword belw = belwether
always ben 12-26
word benefic 23-1345-15-124-24-14
sufword beneficence 23-1345-15-124-24-14-56-15
sufword beneficent 23-1345-15-124-24-14-26-2345
begword benev 23-1345-15-1236 benevolent
begword benig 23-1345-24-1245 benign
begword benigh 23-1345-24-126 benighted
begword benu 23-1345-136 benumbed
begword ber 12-12456
begword bera 23-1235-1 berating
begword bere 23-1235-15 bereft
begword berea 23-1235-2 bereaved
begword beren 12-12456-26 Berengaria, Berenice
begword beres 12-12456-15-234 Beresford, Beresina
begword berh 23-1235-125 berhymed
begword beribb 23-1235-24-23 beribboned
begword bering 23-1235-346 beringed (assume Bering with no suffix refers to the Sea and use "er")
begword bero 23-1235-135 berobed
begword beru 23-1235-136 beruffled
always best 12-15-34
begword besta 23-34-1 bestad bestain
sufword bestar 23-34-345
sufword bestead 23-34-2-145
sufword bestick 23-34-24-14-13
sufword bestir 23-34-24-1235
sufword bestow 23-34-246
begword bestr 23-34-1235 bestraddle bestreak
begword bestu 23-34-136 bestuck bestudded
always beth 12-15-1456 Bethany
always bethe 12-15-2346 Bethel (Hans) Bethe
sufword bethink 23-1456-35-13
sufword bethought 23-1456-5-1256
always bets =
always bett =
sufword betther 12-15-2345-2346-1235 Irish dialect for Better
sufword betz = Betz
begword beu = Beula Beulah
begword beuncl 23-136-1345-14-123 beuncled
sufword bev = bevies
begword bever 12-5-15 Beverly beverage
always bio =
midendword bious 12-24-1256-234 dubious
joinword by 356
word by-and-by 12-13456-36-12346-36-12-13456
always because 23-14
word bec =
always before 23-124
word bef =
always behind 23-125
word behring 12-15-125-1235-346
word beh =
word bel =
begword beln = Belnick
sufword below 23-123
always beneath 23-1345
sufword bertheau 12-12456-1456-2-136
always beside 23-234
word bes =
sufword bess = Bessie
always between 23-2345
word bet =
always beyond 23-13456
word bey =
sufword binational 12-24-1345-6-1345-1-123
begword binod = binodal
begword binom = binomial
sufword blake = Blakeney
word ble 3456 amia- ble, but not amia- bleness
midendword ble 3456
midendword bleau 12-123-2-136 tableau
midendword bleed 12-123-15-1246 nosebleed
always bless 12-46-234 joblessness
before vowel always blind 12-123-35-145
always blind 12-123
contraction bl
begword bluenos = bluenosed
sufword boat = boathook
sufword boende 12-135-26-145-15 town (Republic of Congo)
sufword boer = boerhaave
begword bonedr 12-5-135-145-1235 bonedry
sufword boneset 12-5-135-234-15-2345
begword bottlenos = bottlenose dolphin
always braille 12-1235-123
contraction brl
sufword brigham =
sufword burlingame 12-136-1235-123-346-1-134-15
word but 12
sufword bysshe 12-13456-234-146-15 Percy Bysshe Shelley

# the letter c
always c 14
always C 14
sufword cajones =
begword calcedon 14-1-123-14-1246-135-1345 calcedony calcedonies
begword cart 14-345-2345 carthorse
word carthage 14-345-1456-1-1245-15
midword cch 14-16
sufword chalcedon 16-1-123-14-1246-135-1345 chalcedony chalcedonies
sufword cheat 16-2-2345 Cheatham
always chlor 16-123-135-1235 dichlordiphenylethylene, chloroform
sufword christmas 16-1235-24-34-134-1-234 Christmastide
sufword ciboneyes =
sufword citron = citronella
sufword clemenceau 14-123-15-134-26-14-2-136
sufword clothes 14-123-135-2346-234 clotheshorse
sufword coat = coathanger
sufword coed 14-135-1246
begword coen 14-135-26 coenzyme (Bana)
begword cofac = cofactor
always cofound 14-135-124-46-145
word cojones =
sufword colonel =
begword com 36
sufword comedic 36-1246-24-14 comedically
begword comen 14-135-134-26 John Amos Comenius
word comin 36-24-1345
sufword comin' 36-24-1345-3 comin's and goin's; I'm--comin' home
begword comingl 14-135-134-346-123 comingle
sufword common 36-134-135-1345 commonest
begword con 25
sufword conan =
sufword conceive 25-14-1236
word concv =
word concvd =
word concvr =
word concvs =
word concvst =
word concvth =
sufword conceiving 25-14-1236-1245
word concvg =
word conch 14-135-1345-16
word conches 14-135-1345-16-15-234
sufword cone 14-5-135
word coned 14-135-1345-1246
sufword conelrad =
sufword coney =
word conies =
sufword conk =
word cons 14-135-1345-234
sufword conundrum = 
word cony =
sufword coronel =
always could 14-145
contraction cd
sufword cowork 14-135-5-2456
begword cowrit = cowrite
begword cowrot = cowrote
midword cc 25
word can 14
always cannot 456-14
word ch =
always ch 16
always character 5-16
sufword chatham 16-1-2345-125-1-134
always chemo 16-15-134-135
word child 16
always children 16-1345
word chn =
sufword chisholm 16-24-234-125-135-123-134
sufword clever 14-123-5-15 cleverest
sufword credo 14-1235-1246-135 credos
sufword cross = crosstree

# the letter d
always d 145
always D 145
word d'you 145-3-13456-1256
begword dachs 145-1-16-234 dachshund
begword dared 145-345-15-145 daredevil
always day 5-145
word day-to-day 5-145-36-2345-135-36-5-145
begword deact = deactivation
begword deall = deallocate
begword decarb 145-15-14-345-12
always deceive 145-14-1236
contraction dcv
contraction dcvd
contraction dcvr
contraction dcvs
word dcvst =
word dcvth =
always deceiving 145-14-1236-1245
contraction dcvg
always declare 145-14-123
contraction dcl
contraction dcld
contraction dclr
contraction dcls
word dclst =
word dclth =
always declaring 145-14-123-1245
contraction dclg
begword deref = dereferencing
begword dereg = deregulation
word deshabille =
midword dd 256
midendword ddamn =
midendword dday 145-5-145 midday
begword dedic 145-1246-24-14 dedicated
always dedu = nondeductible
sufword denational 145-15-1345-6-1345-1-123 denationalization
begword denaz = denazification
begword deno = denote
always denom =
begword denou 145-15-1345-1256 denounce
begword denu = denunciation
begword dera = derail
begword deri 145-15-1235-24
begword dero = derogatory
sufword dew = Dewhurst
begword dingh 145-35-126 dinghy
begword dinu 145-24-1345-136
begword dis 256
word disc =
word discs =
sufword dish 145-24-146
begword disha 256-125-1 dishabille
begword disharmon 256-125-345-134-135-1345 disharmony
begword dishear 256-125-15-345 disheartened
begword disho 256-125-135 dishonor
begword dishone 256-125-5-135 dishonest
begword disin 256-35 disingenuous
sufword disk =
sufword dispirit 145-24-456-234 dispirited
midword dist = contradistinction
midendword distic 145-24-34-24-14 Methodistic Methodistical
endword dists 145-24-34-234 Methodists
begword disul = disulfide
word do 145
before o begword dogg =
word doggo 145-135-2356-135
begword donega = Donegalers, Donegan
always dumb = dumbbell
begword dumble 145-136-134-3456 dumbledor
sufword dumfries = Dumfriesshire
